District of Columbia statutes.
47-1027

General Education Board.

(a)

All real property of the General Education Board within the District of Columbia which shall be used by the corporation for the educational or other purposes of the corporation as aforesaid, other than the purpose of producing income, and all personal property and funds of the corporation held, used, or invested for educational purposes as aforesaid, or to produce income to be used for such purposes, shall be exempt from taxation; provided, however, that this exemption shall not apply to any property of the corporation which shall not be used for, or the income of which shall not be applied to, the educational purposes of the corporation; and provided further, that the corporation shall annually file with the Secretary of the Interior of the United States a report in writing, stating in detail the property, real and personal, held by the corporation, and the expenditure or other use or disposition of the same or the income thereof during the preceding year.

(b)

This section shall be subject to alteration, amendment, or repeal at the pleasure of the Congress of the United States.

Jan. 12, 1903, 32 Stat. 769, ch. 91, §§ 6, 7
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1027.
1973 Ed., § 47-820.